ro-RO: Culoare a fumului: Albastru; Verde; Portocaliu; Roșu; Alb; Galben; Alta
es: Color del humo: Azul; Verde; Naranja; Rojo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
it: Colore del fumo: Blu; Verde; Arancione; Rosso; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
vi: Màu khói: Màu xanh dương; Màu xanh lá cây; Màu cam; Màu đỏ; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
zh-TW: 煙霧顏色: 藍色; 綠色; 橙色; 紅色; 白色; 黃色; 其他
nb: Røykfarge: Blå; Grønn; Oransje; Rød; Hvit; Gul; Annet
fr: Couleur de la fumée: Bleu; Vert; Orange; Rouge; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
pt-PT: Cor do fumo: Azul; Verde; Laranja; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
en: Smoke color: Blue; Green; Orange; Red; White; Yellow; Other
nl: Rook kleur: Blauw; Groen; Oranje; Rood; Wit; Geel; Anders
ja: 煙の色: 青; 緑; オレンジ; 赤; 白; 黄色; その他
pl: Kolor dymu: Niebieski; Zielony; Pomarańczowy; Czerwony; Biały; Żółty; Inny
fi: Savun väri: Sininen; Vihreä; Oranssi; Punainen; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
de: Rauchfarbe: Blau; Grün; Orange; Rot; Weiß; Gelb; Andere
zh-CN: 烟雾颜色: 蓝色; 绿色; 橙色; 红色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
cs: Barva kouře: Modrá; Zelená; Oranžová; Červená; Bílá; Žlutá; Jiná
sl-SI: Barva dima: Modra; Zelena; Oranžna; Rdeča; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
lt-LT: Dūmų spalva: Mėlyna; Žalia; Oranžinė; Raudona; Balta; Geltona; Kita
da: Røgfarve: Blå; Grøn; Orange; Rød; Hvid; Gul; Andet
tr: Duman rengi: Mavi; Yeşil; Turuncu; Kırmızı; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
bg-BG: Цвят на дима: Син; Зелен; Оранжев; Червен; Бял; Жълт; Друг
hr-HR: Boja dima: Plava; Zelena; Narančasta; Crvena; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
hu: Füstszín: Kék; Zöld; Narancssárga; Piros; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
ko: 연기 색상: 파란색; 녹색; 주황색; 빨간색; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
pt-BR: Fumaça cor: Azul; Verde; Laranja; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outra
el: Χρώμα καπνού: Μπλε; Πράσινο; Πορτοκαλί; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
ru: Цвет дыма: Синий; Зеленый; Оранжевый; Красный; Белый; Жёлтый; Другое
sv: Rökfärg: Blå; Grön; Orange; Röd; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
th: สีควัน: สีน้ำเงิน; สีเขียว; สีส้ม; สีแดง; สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Dymová farba: Modrá; Zelená; Oranžová; Červená; Biela; Žltá; Iná